Utah statutes.
23-28-302.   Limitations on local regulations.

(1) (a)  A county within which a migratory bird production area is located shall encourage the continuity, development, and viability of the migratory bird production area.

(b)  A structure or improvement historically or customarily used in conjunction with a migratory bird production area is considered a permitted use under the county's zoning law, ordinance, or regulation.

(2)  A county within which a migratory bird production area is located may not:

(a)  enact a law, ordinance, or regulation that unreasonably restricts an activity normally associated with the migratory bird production area;

(b)  change the zoning designation of, or a zoning regulation applying to land within a migratory bird production area unless the county receives written approval for the change from all the landowners within the migratory bird production area; or

(c)  enact a law, ordinance, or regulation concerning the use, operation, or discharge of a firearm that is more restrictive than state law, except as provided by Subsection 23-14-1(3)(b).

